Utah statutes.
53-7-306.   Duties and powers of the board -- Fee setting.

(1)  The board shall monitor rates charged in the industry for container removal.

(2)  The board may:

(a)  set civil penalties for violation of any rule or order made under this part;

(b)  in conducting hearings on the issuance or revocation of any license:

(i)  compel the attendance of witnesses by subpoena;

(ii)  require the production of any records or documents determined by it to be pertinent to the subject matter of the hearing; and

(iii)  apply to the district court of the county where the hearing is held for an order citing any applicant or witness for contempt, and for failure to attend, testify, or produce required documents;

(c)  suspend or revoke licenses and refuse renewals of licenses if the applicant or licensee has been guilty of conduct harmful to either the safety or protection of the public;

(d)  adopt bylaws for its procedures and methods of operation; and

(e)  at the request of the enforcing authority, grant exceptions from its rules to accommodate local needs as it determines to be in the best interest of public safety or the persons using LPG materials or services.

(3)  The board shall, in accordance with Section 53-7-314, establish fees to cover the cost of administering this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

